Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3521
Information; considered public record; classifications.

In addition to public records under section 29-3520, information consisting of the following classifications shall be considered public record for purposes of dissemination: (1) Posters, announcements, lists for identifying or apprehending fugitives or wanted persons, or photographs taken in conjunction with an arrest for purposes of identification of the arrested person; (2) original records of entry such as police blotters, offense reports, or incident reports maintained by criminal justice agencies; (3) court records of any judicial proceeding; and (4) records of traffic offenses maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purpose of regulating the issuance, suspension, revocation, or renewal of driver's or other operator's licenses.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 23.